Idaho, session 2026, S1295.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 19-202, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-202. RESISTANCE BY THREATENED PARTY. (1) Resistance sufficient to
prevent the offense may be made by the person about to be injured:
(a) To prevent an offense against his person, or his family, or some
member thereof; or
(b) To prevent an illegal attempt by force to take or injure property in
his lawful possession.
(2) The defensive display or declaration of a firearm by a person is
justified when and to the extent a reasonable person would believe that
physical force is necessary to protect the person or another person against
the use or attempted use of unlawful physical force, including deadly force.
The provisions of this subsection do not apply to someone who intentionally
provokes another person to use or attempt to use unlawful physical force or
deadly physical force. For purposes of this section, "defensive display or
declaration of a firearm" shall include:
(a) Verbally informing another person that the person possesses or has
available a firearm; and
(b) Exposing, or displaying, or placing a person's hand on a firearm
while the firearm is contained in a holster, pocket, purse, or other
means of containment or transport in a manner that a reasonable person
would understand was meant to protect the person or another against
an unlawful use or attempted use of physical force or deadly physical
force. a firearm outside of its container or holster; and
(c) Placing a person's hand on a firearm while the firearm is contained
in a holster, pocket, purse, or other means of containment or transport
in a manner that a reasonable person would understand was meant to pro-
tect the person or another against an unlawful use or attempted use of
physical force or deadly physical force.
(3) The provisions of this section do not require a defensive display
or declaration of a firearm before the use of physical force or deadly physi-
cal force, or threat of physical force or deadly physical force, by a person
who is otherwise justified in the use or threatened use of physical force or
deadly physical force.
(4) A person acting pursuant to this section may use such degree and
extent of force as would appear to be reasonably necessary to prevent the
threatened injury. Reasonableness is to be judged from the viewpoint of a


reasonable person placed in the same position and seeing and knowing what the
person then saw and knew without the benefit of hindsight.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.